test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoonsshiwaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: gookookhoonsshinwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: gookookhoonsshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: ngookookhoonyshibniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonyshibniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonyshibniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsshibniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsshibniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsshibniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: ggookookhoonyshibniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonyshibniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonyshibniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsshibniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsshibniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsshibniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonyshibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonyshibniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonsshibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsshibniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonyshibniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonyshibniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonyshibniig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonsshibniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsshibniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonsshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonynaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonynaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonynaanbaniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsnaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsnaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonynaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonynaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonynaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonywaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonywaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonywaabniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsnaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsnaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonswaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonswaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonswaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonywaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonywaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonyniwbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonyniwbaniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoonswaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonswaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoonsniwbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoomshinaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoomshinaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoomshinaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoomshinaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoomshiwaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoomshiwaadig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: gookookhoomshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoomshinaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoomshinaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoomshinaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoomshinaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoomshinaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoomshinaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoomshiwaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoomshiwaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoomshiwaag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gookookhoomshiwaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoomshiwaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: gookookhoomshinwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: gookookhoomshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ngookookhoomshibniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoomshibniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoomshibniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ggookookhoomshibniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoomshibniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoomshibniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoomshibniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoomshibniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoomshibniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoomshibniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookhoomshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoomnaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoomnaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoomnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoomnaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoomnaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoomnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoomwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoomwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoomwaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhoomwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhoomwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhoomniwbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhoomniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhooshnaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhooshnaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhooshnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhooshnaanbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhooshnaanbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhooshnaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhooshwaabniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: ggookookhooshwaabniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: ggookookhooshwaabniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gookookhooshwaabniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gookookhooshwaabniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: gookookhooshniwbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: gookookhooshniwbaniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoonymishnaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonymishnaandig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ngookookhoonsmishnaanba
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ngookookhoonsmishnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonymishnaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonymishnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonymishwaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonymishwaadig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonsmishnaanba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishnaandig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: ggookookhoonsmishwaaba
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishwaadig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: gookookhoonymishniwba
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: gookookhoonsmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoonymishnaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoonymishnaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoonymishnaanig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ngookookhoonsmishnaanin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ngookookhoonsmishnaaning
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ngookookhoonsmishnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoonymishnaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonymishnaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonymishnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoonymishwaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonymishwaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonymishwaag
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ggookookhoonsmishnaanin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonsmishnaaning
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishnaanig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: ggookookhoonsmishwaan
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: ggookookhoonsmishwaang
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishwaag
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gookookhoonymishwaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoonymishwaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: gookookhoonymishniwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: gookookhoonymishniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gookookhoonsmishwaan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gookookhoonsmishwaang
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: gookookhoonsmishniwan
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: gookookhoonsmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ngookookhoonymishbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonymishbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonymishbaniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsmishbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsmishbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsmishbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ggookookhoonymishbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonymishbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonymishbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ggookookhoonsmishbaniin
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ggookookhoonsmishbaniing
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ggookookhoonsmishbaniig
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonymishbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonymishbaniing
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonsmishbaniin
     3+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsmishbaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonymishbaniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonymishbaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonymishbaniig
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gookookhoonsmishbaniin
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookhoonsmishbaniing
     X+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookhoonsmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonyminaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonyminaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonyminaanbaniig
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ngookookhoonsminaanbaniin
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ngookookhoonsminaanbaniing
     1+gookook'oo+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ngookookhoonsminaanbaniig
     2+gookook'oo+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ggookookhoonyminaanbaniin
